Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Motor Vehicle Licenses
186.166.
Perpetual production of certain special license plates — Design of Purple Heart license plates.

The Transportation Cabinet shall, unless directed otherwise by the General Assembly, perpetually produce the following special license plates: military license plates, military unit license plates, U.S. Congressional license plates, firefighter license plates, emergency management license plates, Fraternal Order of Police license plates, Law Enforcement Memorial license plates, street rod license plates, nature license plates, amateur radio license plates, Kentucky General Assembly license plates, Kentucky Court of Justice license plates, Masonic Order license plates, collegiate license plates, independent college and university license plates, child victims’ trust fund license plates, Kentucky Horse Council license plates, Ducks Unlimited license plates, Gold Star Mothers, Fathers, and Spouses license plates, Gold Star Siblings, Sons, and Daughters license plates, Silver Star Medal license plates, Bronze Star Medal license plates, Air Medal license plates, Distinguished Flying Cross license plates, Combat Action Badge license plates, Combat Infantry Badge license plates, POW/MIA Awareness license plates, spay neuter license plates, service academy license plates, and I Support Veterans license plates.

The design of the plates identified for perpetual production under this section may be revised upon request of a group or organization requesting a design revision under the provisions of KRS 186.164(15).

The design of a Purple Heart license plate shall not include any representation of the word “Kentucky” that is a registered trademark or slogan which appears on a general issue license plate.

The design of a Purple Heart license plate shall include a representation of the Purple Heart medal and the words “Combat Wounded.”

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 133, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 40, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 164, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 72, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 10, § 3, effective July 12, 2012, (see note); 2013, ch. 117, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2014 ch. 91, § 3, effective January 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 50, § 3, effective January 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 92, § 4, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2013). 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 117, sec. 2, provides that the design specifications indicated in subsection (3)(b) of this statute “shall be included in the first regularly scheduled replating of the Purple Heart license plate after [June 25, 2013].”

(7/12/2012). The amendment to this statute in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 10, sec. 3, takes effect on July 12, 2012. The effective date of that amendment was subject to a contingency, but the contingency was removed in 2012. Section 5 of 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 139, which is effective July 12, 2012, repeals 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 10, sec. 4, which established the contingency.

186.167.
Masonic Homes of Kentucky, Inc. — Petition for voluntary contributions under KRS 186.164. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 17, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 107, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

186.168.
Voluntary contributions to veterans’ program trust fund upon registering vehicle.

Any person may, when initially registering or renewing any motor vehicle registration, make a voluntary contribution to the veterans’ program trust fund established under KRS 40.460(2)(b). Any monetary contribution shall be accepted, and there shall not be a minimum amount that may be contributed. The county clerk shall forward contributions made under this section in the same manner as funds are forwarded under KRS

186.164

.

The cabinet shall provide each county clerk’s office with a poster to promote voluntary contributions to the veterans’ program trust fund that meets the following specifications:

It shall be bright and colorful and at a minimum measure thirty-six (36) inches in width and thirty-six (36) inches in length;

It shall state the purpose of the veterans’ program trust fund and the agency where the contributions are sent; and

It shall list the specific ways in which money from the trust fund is used to assist veterans across the Commonwealth.

The design of the poster shall be developed collectively by the cabinet and the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs. The poster may be redesigned periodically if the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs determines that a new design will increase contributions to the veterans’ program trust fund under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 133, § 4, effective June 20, 2005.

186.170.
Display of registration plates, insignia — Decals to cover corporation trademark — Registration years. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

Except as provided in this subsection and in KRS

186.045

, the owner shall have the receipt issued by the cabinet through the county clerk constantly in his possession, and shall display the registration plate conspicuously upon the rear of the motor vehicle, except that the registration plate upon a semitrailer-tractor shall be displayed upon the front of the tractor. The owner’s copy, or a reproduced copy thereof, of the registration receipt of every motor vehicle, except motorcycles, licensed under KRS

186.050

shall be kept in the vehicle at all times and shall be available for inspection. Plates shall be kept legible at all times and the rear plate shall be illuminated when being operated during the hours designated in KRS

189.030

. No rim, frame, or other covering around the plate shall in any way obscure or cover any lettering or decal on the plate; except that, any owner who objects to the display of a trademark of a private corporation which appears on the registration plate shall be entitled to receive a set of decals from the county clerk in his county of residence to cover the trademark of the private corporation. The owner may apply for the decal by presenting his certificate of registration either at the time of registration renewal or later. The county clerk shall charge a three dollar ($3) clerk’s fee for issuing the decal set if it is applied for a time other than at registration renewal. If the cabinet has prescribed that plates shall continue in use, it shall each year, in addition to the registration receipt, select and give to the owner as further evidence of registration some insignia which may conveniently be attached permanently and conspicuously to the motor vehicle during each registration year. It shall be the duty of the owner to attach the insignia in the prescribed manner and no person may operate a motor vehicle unless the insignia is affixed upon it. The cabinet shall have placed on the insignia either figures, letters, writing, marks, or a combination thereof, which indicate that the motor vehicle has been registered and which in conjunction with the records of the cabinet make identity of the registrant readily ascertainable.

The registration year for commercial vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, mobile homes, and recreational vehicles shall be from April 1 to March 31.

At the discretion of the vehicle owner, the title to a motor vehicle may be held in the system and subsequently printed and mailed to the owner at the owner’s request.

History.

2739g-11: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, §§ 5, 10; 1954, ch. 153, § 5; 1958, ch. 82, § 5; 1962, ch. 62, § 9; 1966, ch. 139, § 11; 1976, ch. 133, § 9; 1978, ch. 239, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 395, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 86, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 431, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 287, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 428, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 97, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 128, § 10, effective July 15, 1998.

186.170.
Retention of receipt — Display of registration plates — Decals to cover corporation trademark — Registration years. [Effective January 1, 2024]

Except as provided in this subsection and KRS

186A.127

and

186.045

, the owner shall have the receipt issued by the cabinet through the county clerk constantly in his possession, and shall display the registration plate conspicuously upon the rear of the motor vehicle, except that the registration plate upon a semitrailer-tractor shall be displayed upon the front of the tractor. The owner’s copy, or a reproduced copy thereof, of the registration receipt of every motor vehicle, except motorcycles, licensed under KRS

186.050

shall be kept in the vehicle at all times and shall be available for inspection. Plates shall be kept legible at all times and the rear plate shall be illuminated when being operated during the hours designated in KRS

189.030

. No rim, frame, or other covering around the plate shall in any way obscure or cover any lettering or decal on the plate; except that, any owner who objects to the display of a trademark of a private corporation which appears on the registration plate shall be entitled to receive a set of decals from the county clerk in his or her county of residence to cover the trademark of the private corporation. The owner may apply for the decal by presenting his or her certificate of registration either at the time of registration renewal or later. The county clerk shall charge a three dollar ($3) clerk’s fee for issuing the decal set if it is applied for a time other than at registration renewal. If the cabinet has prescribed that plates shall continue in use, it shall each year, in addition to the registration receipt, select and give to the owner as further evidence of registration some insignia which may conveniently be attached permanently and conspicuously to the motor vehicle during each registration year. It shall be the duty of the owner to attach the insignia in the prescribed manner and no person may operate a motor vehicle unless the insignia is affixed upon it. The cabinet shall have placed on the insignia either figures, letters, writing, marks, or a combination thereof, which indicate that the motor vehicle has been registered and which in conjunction with the records of the cabinet make identity of the registrant readily ascertainable.

The registration year for commercial vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, mobile homes, and recreational vehicles shall be from April 1 to March 31.

At the discretion of the vehicle owner, the title to a motor vehicle may be held in the system and subsequently printed and mailed to the owner at the owner’s request.

HISTORY:

2739g-11: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, §§ 5, 10; 1954, ch. 153, § 5; 1958, ch. 82, § 5; 1962, ch. 62, § 9; 1966, ch. 139, § 11; 1976, ch. 133, § 9; 1978, ch. 239, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 395, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 86, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 431, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 287, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 428, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 97, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 128, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2022 ch. 18, § 14, effective January 1, 2024.

186.1701.
Special license plate for former prisoner of war. [Repealed.]

186.1702.
Special license plate for survivors of the attack on Pearl Harbor. [Repealed.]

186.171.
Special license plates for members of Congress. [Repealed.]

186.172.
Special license plates for firefighters.

Upon application to the county clerk of the county of his residence, any current or retired member of a fire department, volunteer fire department, or fire protection district in the Commonwealth shall be issued a special firefighter license plate that shall bear the inscription “Firefighter,” a registration number, and an appropriate standardized insignia.

Each initial or renewal application shall be accompanied by proof of current service or retirement as a firefighter as furnished by the fire chief, the mayor or trustee of a city, or the county judge/executive in appropriate rural areas, and the payment of the fees set forth in KRS

186.162

.

The special firefighter license plate shall be administered in the same manner as other special license plates as prescribed in KRS

186.164

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 303, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 150, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 194, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 428, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 2008, ch. 164, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 107, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

186.1721.
Special license plate for disaster and emergency services staff members. [Repealed.]

186.1722.
I Support Veterans special license plate.

Upon application to the county clerk of the county of his or her residence, the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(1) or (3)(a) may obtain an I Support Veterans special license plate.

Each initial or renewal application for an I Support Veterans special license plate shall be subject to payment of the fees set forth in KRS

186.162

and the distribution and auditing requirements set forth in KRS

186.164

.

The EF portion of the fees collected under KRS

186.162

for an I Support Veterans special license plate shall be distributed to the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs and are hereby appropriated for purposes that support veterans. These funds shall be in addition to any other appropriations or resources available to the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

The I Support Veterans special license plate shall be administered in the same manner as other special license plates as prescribed in KRS

186.162

.

The printing of the I Support Veterans special license plate shall not be contingent on any minimum number of applications.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 10, § 1, effective July 12, 2012 (see note).

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). This statute takes effect on July 12, 2012. Its effective date was subject to a contingency, but the contingency has been removed. Section 5 of
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 139, which is effective July 12, 2012,
repeals
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 10, sec. 4, which established the contingency. Section 6 of
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 139 states, “KRS

186.162

and

186.1722

, as created or amended by
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 10, relating to an I Support Veterans special license plate, shall be effective on the normal effective date for the legislation enacted at the 2012 Regular Session of the General Assembly.” The normal effective date for that 2012 legislation is July 12, 2012.

186.1723.
Special license plate for member of Fraternal Order of Police. [Repealed.]

186.1724.
Special license plates for law enforcement memorial. [Repealed.]

186.1725.
Special license plate for active or retired professional firefighters. [Repealed.]

186.1726.
Special license plate for Knights of Columbus. [Repealed.]

186.1727.
Application for special license plate for active or retired professional firefighters and Knights of Columbus — Fees — Disposition of funds received. [Repealed.]

186.173.
Special license plates for active or retired members of the National Guard. [Repealed.]

186.1731.
License plate for members of the Civil Air Patrol. [Repealed.]

186.1732.
Special license plate for active, reserve, retired, and veteran members of the United States Armed Forces. [Repealed.]

186.1733.
Special license plate for member or veteran of the Marine Corps League. [Repealed.]

186.174.
Personalized license plates.

For purposes of this section, “personalized license plate” means a license plate manufactured by the cabinet upon an applicant’s request with specific letters or numbers or combinations of letters and numbers significant to the applicant.

Any owner or lessee of a motor vehicle that is required to be registered under the provisions of KRS 186.050(1), (3)(a), or (4)(a), or any owner or lessee of a motorcycle required to be registered under the provisions of KRS 186.050(2) may obtain a personalized license plate by submitting an application through a Web site designated by the cabinet. The cabinet shall produce the requested license plate upon approval and receipt of the fee required in subsection (4) of this section for a special license plate, or the fee required in KRS

186.162

for a standard issue license plate.

Personalized license plates shall expire on the last day of the birth month of the person to whom the license plate is registered.

A personalized license plate shall be replaced on the same schedule as regular issue license plates unless it is damaged or unreadable.

A standard issued license plate may be personalized for a forty-three dollar ($43) fee as provided in KRS 186.162(2)(m), in addition to all other fees established in this section and in KRS

186.050

.

Any special license plate may be combined with a personalized license plate for a twenty-five dollar ($25) state fee in addition to all other fees for the particular special license plate established in this section and in KRS

186.164

. The twenty-five dollar ($25) fee required under this paragraph shall be divided between the cabinet and the county clerk of the county where the applicant resides with the cabinet receiving twenty dollars ($20) and the county clerk receiving five dollars ($5).

A personalized plate shall not be issued that would conflict with or duplicate any current issued license plate.

A personalized plate shall not be issued if the cabinet determines:

The message to be placed on the license plate, if created, discriminates against a race, color, religion, sex, or national origin;

The plate message is the name of a trademarked or copyrighted product or brand name; or

The plate’s lettering or message is obscene or profane, as determined by the cabinet.

Once an applicant obtains a personalized plate, he or she will have first priority on that plate for each of the following years that he or she makes timely renewal payments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 153, § 3, effective January 1, 1977; 1978, ch. 239, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 203, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 143, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 150, § 10, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 296, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 498, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 428, § 22, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 200, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 543, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 347, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 133, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 148, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 107, § 4, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 155, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Opinions of Attorney General.

As used in this section, “constantly in his possession” means that the operator of the vehicle should have the registration receipt or a reproduced copy thereof either on his person or in the vehicle at all times.

OAG 71-359

.

A personalized plate may be issued with a trade name or brand name on it, restricted only by the requirement of subsection (2) of this section that a plate can only contain a combination of letters and numbers totaling 6.

OAG 76-376

.

The term “money order” as used in subsection (1) of this section includes both United States postal money orders and commercial money orders.

OAG 76-376

.

Only a person who already owns the vehicle he intends to license may apply for a personalized license plate under subsection (1) of this section.

OAG 76-376

.

186.175.
Special plates for amateur radio station licensees — County clerk’s fees. [Repealed.]

186.1751.
Special license plate for “Street Rod” vehicle. [Repealed.]

186.176.
Amateur radio licensees may attach plate showing call letters to license plate. [Repealed.]

186.1761.
Nature license plates. [Repealed.]

186.1765.
Special agricultural license plates. [Repealed.]

186.177.
Special license plates bearing amateur radio call letters. [Repealed.]

186.1775.
Special YMCA license plates. [Repealed.]

186.178.
Special license plates for General Assembly members. [Repealed.]

186.179.
Special license plates for Justices or Judges of the Court of Justice. [Repealed.]

186.180.
Duplicate receipts and plates — Clerk’s fees — Cancellation of registration and issuance of new plates upon loss of plate — Reporting of lost plates — Issuance of plates upon removal from one county to another — Reinstatement after revocation under KRS 186A.040 — Proof of insurance.

If the owner loses his or her copy of a registration or transfer receipt, he or she may obtain a duplicate from the county clerk who issued the present owner’s copy of the receipt by presenting the clerk proof of insurance on the motor vehicle in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

, and by filing an affidavit, upon a form furnished by the cabinet. The owner shall pay to the clerk a fee of three dollars ($3), except proof of insurance shall not be required for duplicates applied for by motor vehicle dealers as defined in KRS

190.010

.

When the owner’s copy of any registration or transfer receipt shows that the spaces provided thereon for noting and discharging security interests have been exhausted, the owner may apply to the county clerk who issued the receipt in order to obtain a duplicate thereof. The owner shall surrender his or her copy of the current receipt to the clerk and provide proof of insurance on the motor vehicle in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

, before a duplicate may be issued. The owner shall pay the clerk a fee of three dollars ($3), except proof of insurance shall not be required for duplicates applied for by motor vehicle dealers as defined in KRS

190.010

.

Any security interest which has been discharged as shown by the records of the clerk or upon the owner’s copy of the current receipt shall be omitted from the duplicate receipt to be issued by the clerk.

If the owner loses a registration plate, he or she shall surrender his or her registration receipt to the county clerk from whom it was obtained and file a written statement as to the loss of the plate. Upon presenting the clerk proof of insurance on the motor vehicle in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

, and upon the payment of the sum of three dollars ($3) for each plate and a fee of three dollars ($3) to the clerk for his or her services, the owner shall be issued another registration receipt and a plate or plates which shall bear a different number from that of the lost plate. The clerk shall retain the owner’s statement and a copy of the owner’s proof of insurance, and shall make a notation on the triplicate copy of the surrendered registration receipt stating the number of the registration receipt replacing it. The original copy of the surrendered receipt shall be forwarded to the cabinet. The cabinet shall forthwith cancel the registration corresponding to the number of the lost plate. The cancellation shall be reported by the cabinet to the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police. Any person finding a lost registration plate shall deliver it to the Transportation Cabinet or to any county clerk for forwarding it to the cabinet.

If the owner moves from one (1) county into another county of the Commonwealth, he or she may obtain a registration plate bearing the name of the county of residence. In order to obtain a new registration plate, the owner shall surrender his or her current registration receipt and current registration plate to the county clerk. Upon being provided with proof of insurance on the motor vehicle in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

, the clerk shall provide the owner with a new registration receipt and plate bearing the county name. The surrendered receipt and plate shall be forwarded to the Transportation Cabinet. The fee for this registration shall be five dollars ($5) of which the clerk shall be entitled to three dollars ($3) and the cabinet shall be entitled to two dollars ($2).

If the owner’s registration is revoked as a result of the provisions set forth in KRS

186A.040

, the owner may have his or her registration reinstated by the county clerk who issued the present owner’s copy of the receipt by presenting the clerk proof of:

Insurance on the motor vehicle in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

and by filing an affidavit upon a form furnished by the cabinet; or

A valid compliance or exemption certificate in compliance with KRS

224.20-720

or issued under the authority of an air pollution control district under KRS

224.20-760

.

The owner of a motor vehicle that has the vehicle’s registration revoked under KRS

186.290

shall pay to the clerk a fee of twenty dollars ($20), which shall be equally divided between the county clerk and the cabinet.

On and after January 1, 2006, if the motor vehicle is a personal motor vehicle as defined in KRS

304.39-087

, proof of insurance required under this section shall be determined by the county clerk as provided in KRS

186A.042

.

History.

2739g-12: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 208, § 2; 1964, ch. 59, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(9); 1976, ch. 89, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 333, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 229, § 2; 1994, ch. 428, § 27, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 341, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 442, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 441, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 130, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2007, ch. 85, § 190, effective June 26, 2007.

186.181.
Seizure of canceled plates by Department of Kentucky State Police.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall, upon receipt of a report from the Transportation Cabinet or the Department of Vehicle Regulation of a canceled motor vehicle registration plate, cause all members of the Department of Kentucky State Police and such peace officers as he or she may deem necessary, to be notified of the cancellation. It shall be the duty of all members of the Department of Kentucky State Police and of all peace officers to seize any registration plate bearing a canceled number and to report such seizure to the appropriate department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 208, § 3; 1958, ch. 126, § 20; 1962, ch. 62, § 10; 2007, ch. 85, § 191, effective June 26, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Enforcement of motor vehicle laws; arrests; bail bonds, KRS

281.765

.

186.182.
Special license plates for recipients of Congressional Medal of Honor. [Repealed.]

186.1831.
Special license plates for members of a Masonic order. [Repealed.]

186.1835.
Special license plates for members of the Knights of Columbus. [Repealed.]

186.184.
Special PTA license plate — PTA program fund. [Repealed.]

186.185.
Collegiate license plate. [Repealed.]

186.186.
Application for special license plates pursuant to KRS 186.186 to 186.1867 — Vehicles leased or provided pursuant to an occupation — Renewal, fees, administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

186.1861.
Special license plates for United States Veterans. [Repealed.]

186.1862.
Special license plates for nurses. [Repealed.]

186.1863.
Special license plates for United States Olympic Committee. [Repealed.]

186.1864.
Special license plates for youth soccer. [Repealed.]

186.1865.
Special Kentucky Tech license plates. [Repealed.]

186.18651.
Special license plates for independent college or university. [Repealed.]

186.1866.
Special license plates for members or retired members of unions. [Repealed.]

186.1867.
Special license plates for child victims’ trust fund. [Repealed.]

186.1868.
Special Kentucky Horse Council license plate. [Repealed.]

186.18685.
Special license plates for Ducks Unlimited. [Repealed.]

186.1869.
Special license plates for members of National Wild Turkey Federation. [Repealed.]

186.187.
Special spay neuter license plate. [Repealed.]

186.188.
Special Louisville Zoo license plate. [Repealed.]

186.189.
Special license plates for special groups or special purposes. [Repealed.]

186.190.
Transfer of registration upon transfer of ownership — Permitted registration plate transfers — Clerk’s fee.

Except as provided for in paragraph (e) of this subsection, when a motor vehicle that has been previously registered changes ownership, the registration plate shall not remain upon the motor vehicle, but shall be retained by the seller and may be transferred to another vehicle owned or leased by the seller in accordance with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection.

An individual who sells a motor vehicle which has a valid registration plate may transfer that plate to another vehicle of the same classification at the time the individual transfers the vehicle. If the individual does not have a vehicle to transfer the plate to at the time the individual sells a vehicle, the individual may hold the registration plate for the period of registration. At any time during the period of registration, the individual shall notify the county clerk and transfer the plate to a vehicle of the same classification that he or she has obtained prior to operating that vehicle on a public highway. If the plate transfer occurs in the final month in which the existing registration is still valid, the individual shall be required to renew the registration on the newly acquired vehicle.

An individual who trades in a motor vehicle with a valid registration plate during the purchase of a motor vehicle from a licensed motor vehicle dealer shall remove the plate from the vehicle offered in trade. A photocopy of the valid certificate of registration shall be included with the application for title and registration for the purchased vehicle, and the plate shall be retained by the purchaser. The dealer shall equip the purchased vehicle with a temporary tag in accordance with KRS

186A.100

before the buyer may operate it on the highway. When the buyer receives a valid certificate of registration from the county clerk, the buyer shall remove the temporary tag and affix the registration plate to the vehicle.

All vehicle transfers and registration plate transfers shall be initiated within the fifteen (15) day period established under KRS

186.020

and

186A.070

.

This subsection shall not apply to transfers between motor vehicle dealers licensed under KRS Chapter 190. A secured party who repossesses a vehicle shall comply with KRS 186.045(6).

A person shall not purchase, sell, or trade any motor vehicle without delivering to the county clerk of the county in which the sale or trade is made the title, and a notarized affidavit if required and available under KRS

138.450

attesting to the total and actual consideration paid or to be paid for the motor vehicle. Except for transactions handled by a motor vehicle dealer licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 190, the person who is purchasing the vehicle shall present proof of insurance in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

to the county clerk before the clerk transfers the registration on the vehicle. Proof of insurance shall be in the manner prescribed in administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of Insurance pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. On and after January 1, 2006, if the motor vehicle is a personal motor vehicle as defined in KRS

304.39-087

, proof of insurance shall be determined by the county clerk as provided in KRS

186A.042

.

Upon delivery of the title, and a notarized affidavit if required and available under KRS

138.450

attesting to the total and actual consideration paid or to be paid for the motor vehicle to the county clerk of the county in which the sale or trade was made, the seller shall pay to the county clerk a transfer fee of two dollars ($2), which shall be remitted to the Transportation Cabinet. If an affidavit is required, and available, the signatures on the affidavit shall be individually notarized before the county clerk shall issue to the purchaser a transfer of registration bearing the same data and information as contained on the original registration receipt, except the change in name and address. The seller shall pay to the county clerk a fee of six dollars ($6) for his services.

If the owner junks or otherwise renders a motor vehicle unfit for future use, he shall deliver the registration plate and registration receipt to the county clerk of the county in which the motor vehicle is junked. The county clerk shall return the plate and motor vehicle registration receipt to the Transportation Cabinet. The owner shall pay to the county clerk one dollar ($1) for his services.

A licensed motor vehicle dealer shall not be required to pay the transfer fee provided by this section, but shall be required to pay the county clerk’s fee provided by this section.

The motor vehicle registration receipt issued by the clerk under this section shall contain information required by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

2739g-13: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 202; 1958, ch. 82, § 6; 1958, ch. 95; 1960, ch. 37, § 1; 1962, ch. 62, § 11; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2), (9); 1974, ch. 222, § 3; 1976, ch. 133, § 10; 1978, ch. 239, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 296, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 36, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 428, § 31, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 504, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 128, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 600, § 6, effective April 14, 1998; 2004, ch. 130, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 255, § 9, effective January 1, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 235, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 5, § 1, effective January 1, 2013.

186.191.
Revocation of document relating to motor vehicle due to illegal act. [Repealed.]

186.1911.
Replacement of vehicle identification number.

In any instance where a transfer of a motor vehicle shall be accompanied by a certificate of title or registration and such vehicle:

Has had the vehicle identification number removed, or

Has had the vehicle identification number altered, or

Has had the vehicle identification number defaced, or

Has had the vehicle identification number covered,

the owner thereof shall, before delivery of the vehicle to any other person obtain a replacement vehicle identification number from the manufacturer and affix it to the vehicle at the places specified by the Department of Vehicle Regulation or obtain a Kentucky identification number from the department and affix it to the vehicle at the places specified by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 296, § 3, effective July 15, 1980.

186.192.
Evidence required of excise tax payment.

The county clerk shall not transfer the registration of any motor vehicle or vehicle as defined in KRS

186.650

unless evidence is presented in such form as the Transportation Cabinet may prescribe that all excise taxes imposed on the sale, transfer or use of the motor vehicle or vehicles have been paid. In any case where the transferor or transferee is a dealer as defined in KRS

190.010

, no proof of payment of such taxes is required.

Any clerk who violates this section shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS 186.990(1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 186, Art. IV, § 11; 1962, ch. 62, § 12.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a sole proprietor sold his business, including motor vehicles, to another individual to operate as a sole proprietorship, the subject sale of motor vehicles was an “occasional sale,” as defined in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of former KRS

139.070

(see now KRS

139.010

) and the seller was thus exempted from paying the use or excise tax pursuant to subsection (4) of KRS

139.470

; accordingly, the county clerk could not refuse to transfer the registration of the motor vehicle pursuant to this section.

OAG 81-233

.

186.193.
Evidence required of ad valorem tax payment.

The county clerk shall not transfer the registration on any motor vehicle or trailer against which a tax lien has been filed until the taxes have been paid and the lien has been released.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 371, § 4, effective January 1, 1981.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A tax lien on an automobile, once perfected by the filing required under KRS 134.148(2) must be paid off by one who seeks to repossess and retransfer an automobile pursuant to a prior recorded security interest; the clerk is prohibited by this section and KRS

186.232

from transferring title until the lien is paid and released.

OAG 83-477

.

KRS

186.232

and this section apply to all tax liens of every sort which have been filed.

OAG 84-339

.

Neither KRS

186.232

nor this section support an arbitrary classification in violation of Ky. Const., §§ 2 and 59; these statutes apply equally to all vehicles and trailers which are to be operated on the highways of this state.

OAG 84-339

.

It is not necessary for tax liens to be noted on the certificate of title or registration, except with respect to ad valorem tax liens as provided in KRS 134.148(4).

OAG 84-339

.

The county clerk can require payment of all tax liens against a mobile home before transferring registration to its new owner if the liens have been properly filed.

OAG 84-339

.

KRS

186.232

and this section do not affect the relationship between the purchaser and the seller of a mobile home; the tax lien is a matter of public record and obviously subject to negotiations between the parties at the time of the sale, transfer of title, and registration. The purchaser is free to accept or reject the offer; if the purchaser accepts the offer, the statutes do not prevent the purchaser from taking title to the mobile home; the statutes only prevent the purchaser from registering the mobile home until the tax lien has been paid.

OAG 84-339

.

186.195.
Recordation of lien information on registration receipt — Assignment or termination of lien. [Repealed.]

186.200.
Contents of bill of sale.

The bill of sale provided for by KRS

186.190

shall contain the date, the purchaser’s name and post office address, seller’s name and post office address, and the information provided for in KRS

186.030

and shall be subscribed and sworn to before any officer authorized to administer an oath.

No person for himself or his employee or agent or as an officer of any court, shall sell, trade, transfer or deliver any motor vehicle without at the same time making a bill of sale in quadruplicate and delivering the original and two (2) copies thereof to the county clerk. The county clerk shall retain one (1) copy of the bill of sale and shall deliver the original copy to the purchaser together with the registration receipt or transfer of registration, and attach the other copy to the Revenue Cabinet’s copy of the registration receipt of transfer of registration. No person shall sign a bill of sale until the purchaser’s name is shown thereon.

History.

2739g-14: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 82, § 7; 1962, ch. 62, § 13; 1976, ch. 133, § 11; 1978, ch. 239, § 14, effective June 17, 1978.